Washington, session 2025-2026, SB5889.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 41.04 RCW to read as follows:Employees of the state and local political subdivisions may use accrued paid leave as a supplemental benefit when on approved paid family and medical leave under Title 50A RCW. The sum of an employee's family or medical benefit and the employee's supplemental benefit may not exceed that employee's salary or average hourly rate. Leave paid as a supplemental benefit may not be included in the weekly claim submitted to the employment security department.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 2. This act takes effect July 1, 2027.--- END ---